Washington statutes.
RCW 3.42.020

Powers of commissioners—Limitations.

Each district court commissioner shall have such power, authority, and jurisdiction in criminal and civil matters as the appointing judges possess and shall prescribe, except that when serving as a commissioner, the commissioner does not have authority to preside over trials in criminal matters, or jury trials in civil matters unless agreed to on the record by all parties.

[ 2008 c 227 s 6; 1984 c 258 s 31; 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 16; 1961 c 299 s 32.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Subheadings not law—2008 c 227: See notes following RCW 3.50.003.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 136: See notes following RCW 46.63.010.